src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON N_CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaana N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihsinnaan N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihsoaayi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiniki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinnaaniki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yinoainiki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'ki N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yihtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yihtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopini N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaanopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yihpoaawopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yiwahtopiyi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyini N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Singular IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg:@R.person.IMP@%>t N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl:@R.person.IMP@%>k N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

! BELOW ARE THE VII SUFFIXES

LEXICON N_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ N_INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ N_CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ N_SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ N_UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON N_INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Inanimate Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waistsaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Sg:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Pl:@R.person.OT@%>yihsi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yisi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES]
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural UNREAL  
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yiwahtopiyi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON N_ANIM_INTERR !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
0 # ;
+Interr:%>hpa # ;

! The following lexicon contains the enclitic pronouns or attached pronouns from Frantz 2017 Chapter 9
! Using the term D3Sg follows Frantz in distinguishing between the 3rd person pronoun used when there
! is only one argument (Distinct third person singular), and just the regular 3rd person pronoun.
! They are not marked as subject or object because they can be either.

LEXICON N_ENCLITICS !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
0 # ;
+PRO+3/%0Pl:%>aawa # ;
+PRO+D3Pl:%>%^PROaiksi # ;
+PRO+D3Sg:%>%^PROáyi # ;
+PRO+D%0Pl:%>%^PROaistsi # ;

!! END OF VERBINESS
